kurdish-BAD.dic
268
بادان/1,6,7,9,11
بارین/2
برن/1,5,6,7,9,11,12,13,15,16,17,21
بریان/1
برین/1,2,3,13
بڕاندن/1,3
بزداندن/1,6
بژارتن/1,3,5,10
بژكاندن/1
بژكين/1
بژیان/1
بووراندن/1,4,8,13
بوورین/3,4,5,9,13
بوون/1,3,5,7,10,12,15,18,21
بێتن/1
بەردان/6,16
بەزاندن/1,2,3
بەزین/1,2,3
بەستن/2,3
بەلاندن/1,2
پاشتن/2
پالدان/4,9
چڕين/1,2,3,4,6,9,112
پچریان/1
پچرین/1,2
پچڕاندن/1,2
پرتکاندن/1
پرژاندن/1,2
پرۆسقاندن/1
پریواندن/3
پژاندن/1,2
پژلاندن/1
پژۆکاندن/1
پشکیان/1
پلتاندن/1
پلدان/
پلوخاندن/1,2
پلوساندن/2
پوراندن/4
پوڕين/
پۆقاندن/4
پێچان/1,2,3,5,6,13
پێچاندن/1,2,4,6,13
پێژان/
پەرخاندن/
پەڕاندن/1
پەڕتاندن/3
پەڕین/13
پەژراندن/1
پەسارتن/3
پەشین/1
پەلکاندن/2
ترساندن/1
ترسین/1
ترکاندن/1
تەرزين/1
تەقین/1,2,3,4,5,7,8,21
تۆران/1,2,3,5
تەقاندن/2,4
تەقیان/2,4
تەمریان/1,2,4
جڤاندن/1,2,3
جنقاندن/1
جنقین/1,2,3
جوين/1
جەماندن/1,2
چاندن/1,2,4,6
چراندن/1,3
چركاندن/13
چركین/13
چڕین/1
چکاندن/14
چکلاندن/4,13,14
چنین/1,3,19
چەقاندن/1,4
چەقين/1,4
چەماندن/1
چوراندن/1,2
چوون/2,3,5,6,8,9,10,13,14,16,21
حەشاندن/1,2,4,6,7,13,15
حەواندن/1
خاپاندن/1
خازتن/1
خاندن/1,7,14
خڕاندن/4,13
خزاندن/1,2
خسکاندن/
خشاندن/3,4,5
خشیان/1,5
خلیسکان/1
خەبتين/13
خوارن/1,7,10
خوارن/1,7
خواستن/1
خوراندن/1,2,7
خوریان/1
خورین/5,7,9
خيساندن/1
دان/1,3,2,3,5,6,7,9,11,12,13,14,15,16,18,20,21
دڕاندن/3
دڕون/1
دڕین/2,3
دزین/1
دۆتن/
دۆشين/
ديتن/1,3
دێران/3
دیتن/1,13,15
رزاندن/2
رژان/1,2
رژیان/1,2,13
رساندن/1
رستن/1
رشان/1
رشتن/1,2
رشیان/1
روتن/1
رووچکاندن/1
رویشاندن/1
رویشیان/1
رێتن/1,2,13
رێلیان/1
رێنین/1,5,16
رەڤین/1
ڕاوەستان/
ڕستن/1,2,6,8,9
ڕەڤين/1,2,3,9
زانين/5,7,8,10
زرین/1,2
زڤراندن/1
زەلاندن/1
زەليان/1
زەلين/1
زۆخاندن/1
زەلاندن/1
زەلیان/1
زەنین/1
ژاندن/1
ژەنين/1,2
ژيان/1
ژين/1
ژين/1,3
سپارتن/4
سترين/1
سۆتن/1
سۆتن/
شاندن/
شداندن/1,4,6
شكەستن/
شكيان/
شکاندن/1,2,6
شوشتن/,
شێلان/1,6
شەقاندن/13
شەمراندن/1
شەهتاندن/1
فڕاندن/3,4
فڕین/3
ڤەشارتن/
ڤيان/
قڕاندن/1,2,17
قوپاندن/
قوتان/1,2,4,6,8,13
قورتاندن/2
قورچاندن/2
قوساندن/1
قولپاندن/4,13
قەتاندن/1
قەتیان/1
قەومین/5
كرن/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,11,13,15,16,18,20,21
كڕين/
كشاندن/1,2,3,5,6,7,13
كەڤتن/3,4,6,7,8,9,10,13,17
كەلان/
كەلين/3
كەنين/7
كولان/1
كۆتين/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,13
كۆشتن/1
کوشتن/1
کۆتاندن/2,3
کۆلان/1,3,5
کۆلین/1,3,5
کێشان/1,2,3,4,6,7,10,12,16
کەتن/1,2,3,4,6,9,13,17
کەفتن/2,5,6,7,8,9,13,17
کەلاندن/2,4,6
کەلۆتن/1
کەنین/7
گرتن/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,10,11,13,14,15,21
گريان/
گرێدان/1,5,7,21
گژگژاندن/1
گڤاشتن/1,3,13
گەڕين/1,2,3,5,10,11
گەزاندن/1
گەزتن/1
گەزين/1
گوهارتن/8,9
گوهشین/1,4
گوهۆڕين/
گۆتن/7
گیڕان/1,2,5,10,11
گەریان/1,5,10,11
گەڕاندن/1,10
گەشین/1
گەفزاندن/1
گەهاندن/4,7,8,12,13
گەهشتن/6,7,8,13
لقاندن/2
لەقاندن/1,2
مالشتن/1,3
مالین/1,2,4
مان/1,2,15,21
ماندن/1,11
مراندن/1,2
مرقین/1
مرن/1,7
مریستن/1,3
مژاندن/3
مژين/
مێتن/3
مێژتن/3
ناساندن/5
نالين/
نڤاندن/5
نڤستن/1,4,5,7,13
نڤیسین/1,2,7
نقاندن/
نماندن/1
نمیان/1
نویساندن/1,6,8,12,21
نویسیان/1,6,8,12,21
نیشتن/2,14
هاتن/2,3,3,4,5,7,8,9,10,12,13,14,16,20,21
هاژۆتن/4
هاڤێتن/4
هاندن/1
هایدان/5
هساندن/1
هسیان/1
هسین/1
هلاندن/3,5,13
هلدان/13
هنجنین/1
هونین/1
هێران/1
هێشتن/2,4
هێلان/1,2,4,7
هەژاندن/1,2,4
هەژیان/1,4
وێران/3,7
وەراندن/1,2,3,5,13
وەریان/1,2,3,13
وەستان/2
وەستیان/2
وەشاندن/1,2,3,4,7
وەشیان/1,3,4
وەشین/1,3
ئاخڤتن/8,10
ئاژووتن/
ئاڤێتن/3,4
ئالاندن/5,6,13
ئالیان/6,13
ئێخستن/2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9,12,13,14,17
ئێشان/
ئینان/2,3,4,5,8,9,11,12
